District of Columbia statutes.
7-504.07

Chairperson.

The Commission shall select its own Chairperson, by vote.

History

Oct. 29, 1975, D.C. Law 1-24, title IV, § 407, 22 DCR 2461

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2227.
1973 Ed., § 6-1727.